Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1801
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-1801 to 38-1823 shall be known and may be cited as the Medical Nutrition Therapy Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 623;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 24;

Laws 2024, LB1215, § 8.